Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5516.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "foreign law limitation act". Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Constitutional right" means a right protected by the Constitution of the United States or the state constitution of 1963. (b) "Foreign law" means a law, legal code, or legal system of a jurisdiction or group outside of a state or territory of the United States, including an international organization, religious organization, or treaty. Foreign law does not include federal law of the United States or the laws of the states and territories of the United States. Sec. 3. (1) A court, arbitrator, or administrative body that applies or enforces an agreement, contract, or other legal instrument shall not apply or enforce a provision of foreign law if the application or enforcement would violate a constitutional right of any person that is a resident of this state or whose interests would be impaired by the application of such foreign law. (2) If a provision of an agreement, contract, or other legal instrument is based on foreign law and the application or enforcement of the provision would result in a violation of a constitutional right, a court, arbitrator, or administrative body shall take the following actions, as necessary: (a) Refuse to apply or enforce the provision. (b) Modify the provision to the extent necessary to eliminate the violation. (c) Void the provision if modification is not possible without substantially altering the intent of the parties. (3) This section applies only to actual or foreseeable violations of the constitutional rights of a person caused by the application of the foreign law. Sec. 4. In any case involving the application of foreign law, a court, arbitrator, or administrative body shall, upon motion of any party or upon its own motion, consider all of the following: (a) Whether the application of foreign law would impair a person's constitutional right. (b) Whether the parties knowingly and voluntarily agreed to the application of foreign law, and whether such agreement was entered into under duress or undue influence. (c) The public policy of this state against the enforcement of foreign law that discriminates on the basis of sex, race, religion, or other constitutionally protected characteristics. Sec. 5. This act does not apply to any agreement, contract, or other legal instrument entered into before the effective date of this act. Sec. 6. This act does not modify or supersede any other provision of law that prohibits the enforcement of foreign law or requires the application of federal law of the United States or the laws of the states and territories of the United States.